Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1261] PANHELLENIC PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue Panhellenic special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, along with any other fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $40 annually to the Panhellenic foundations account; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Organization eligibility. new text end new text begin A fraternity or sorority is eligible to request a plate design under this section if the fraternity or sorority: new text end new text begin (1) is a member of the National Pan-Hellenic Council; and new text end new text begin (2) has an affiliated charitable foundation that is a nonprofit organization. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin At the request of an eligible fraternity or sorority or its affiliated charitable foundation, the commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design for that organization. Each design must (1) incorporate an emblem for the requesting organization, and (2) include an inscription that identifies the organization, an associated motto, or the standard inscription used for license plates. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (4), must be deposited in the Panhellenic foundations account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of public safety. This appropriation is first for the annual cost of administering the account, and the remaining money is for distribution to affiliated charitable foundations in the same proportions as the number of plates issued under each plate design relative to the total number of Panhellenic special plates issued for that year. A charitable foundation must use the distributed money solely for charitable purposes that further the organization's mission and purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end